test/src/morphology/V-nwstma83_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - `nõstma: # Verb (83) `nõstma 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     `nõstma+V+Inf/mA: `nõstma
     `nõstma+V+Inf: `nõstaq
     `nõstma+V+ActPrtPrc: `nõstnuq
     `nõstma+V+PssPrtPrc: nõstõt
     `nõstma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: nõsta
     `nõstma+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: nõst
     `nõstma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: [nõsti, `nõstsõ]
     `nõstma+V+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [nõsç, `nõstsõ]
